Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following state entities for the following fiscal years, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES a. For maintenance projects at the state historical building: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 b. For marking historical sites in Iowa that were used to provide shelter or aid as part of the underground railroad, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: House File 1039, p. 2 FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,000 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the water quality initiative administered by the division of soil conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating council. (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating council. (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality practices as described in the latest revision of the document entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa state university of science and technology. (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing for participation by persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land located within the same subwatershed. (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for House File 1039, p. 3 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar water quality practices. The division shall promote field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural land. (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period after accumulating information from such evaluations, the division shall create an aggregated database of water quality practices. Any information identifying a person holding a legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural land shall be a confidential record. (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality practices, including the establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph may be used by the department to support urban soil and water conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided in chapter 161A . (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to the department from a state or federal House File 1039, p. 4 source. (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration and implementation of the water quality initiative administered by the division. b. For deposit in the renewable fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 for renewable fuel infrastructure programs: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 The appropriation made in this lettered paragraph is in lieu of the standing appropriation from the general fund of the state in section 159A.17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, which shall be zero. c. For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 Any information received, collected, or held for purposes of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record exempt from public release if the information identifies a person who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who has previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, a person who is involved or who was previously involved in managing the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock on the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the agricultural land. 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth Street, Des Moines, Iowa: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 559,000 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS For the renovation and construction of a central office for community-based corrections located in district 4: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,163,847 FY 2026-2027: House File 1039, p. 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,775,898 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 c. For equal distribution to regional sports authority districts certified by the authority pursuant to section 15E.321, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 6. IOWA STATE FAIR AUTHORITY For the construction of an agriculture education facility: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 FY 2026-2027: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 7. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES a. For implementation of lake projects that have established watershed improvement initiatives and community support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, including grants for projects relating to eligible water bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: House File 1039, p. 6 FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 8. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE a. For major maintenance projects at national guard armories and facilities: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard installations and readiness centers to support operations and training requirements: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge facility: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 d. The department of public defense shall report to the general assembly by December 15, 2025, regarding the projects the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys appropriated to the department pursuant to this subsection. 9. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY For payments and other costs due under a financing agreement entered into by the treasurer of state for building the statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,486,177 10. BOARD OF REGENTS a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities and utility services at the institutions: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,600,000 House File 1039, p. 7 b. For the renovation and construction of the public policy center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 11. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational trails within the state: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,200,000 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at the commercial service airports within the state: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,900,000 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general aviation airports within the state: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12. TREASURER OF STATE For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county fair vertical infrastructure improvements: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 13. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY For the construction of a driving training facility: FY 2025-2026: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless House File 1039, p. 8 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. Sec. 3. Section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph d, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (f), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (f) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the total moneys in excess of the moneys remaining wagering tax receipts received pursuant to sections 99D.17 and 99F.11 not otherwise deposited under this paragraph âdâ in the revenue bonds debt service fund, the revenue bonds federal subsidy holdback fund, the vision Iowa fund, the water quality infrastructure fund, the Iowa skilled worker and job creation fund, and the general fund of the state shall be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund and shall be used as provided in this section subsection . Sec. 4. Section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph d, subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the subparagraph. Sec. 5. Section 12.72, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Moneys Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the vision Iowa fund are not subject to section 8.33 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 . Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 6. Section 15.261, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys deposited in the vacant buildings demolition fund shall be credited to the vacant buildings demolition House File 1039, p. 9 fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys credited to in the vacant buildings demolition fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 . Sec. 7. Section 15.262, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys deposited in the vacant buildings rehabilitation fund shall be credited to the vacant buildings rehabilitation fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys credited to in the vacant buildings rehabilitation fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 . Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of immediate importance, take effect upon enactment: 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 12.72, subsection 3. 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 15.261, subsection 3. 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 15.262, subsection 3. DIVISION II TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND Sec. 9. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND. There is appropriated from the technology reinvestment fund created in section 8.57C to the following state entities for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS a. For technology projects and upgrades: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,013,466 b. Of the moneys appropriated to the department of corrections under paragraph âaâ, the department shall use not more than the following amounts for the following purposes: (1) For camera system upgrades: House File 1039, p. 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 (2) For Anamosa state penitentiary security fence upgrades: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 546,700 (3) For the Anamosa state penitentiary computer backup system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000 (4) For Fort Dodge correctional facility sodium hydroxide skid and pH analyzer system replacement: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,777 (5) For Fort Dodge correctional facility battery backup system replacement: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 (6) For replacement and expansion of personal data assistants used at the Iowa correctional institution for women: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,725 (7) For Iowa correctional institution for women door control replacements: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 60,602 (8) For staff tracking and identification systems at corrections institutions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 244,129 (9) For building automation system upgrades at corrections institutions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 832,033 (10) For north central correctional facility at Rockwell City phone system upgrades: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,500 (11) For body cameras at corrections institutions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 2. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY For the purchase of an enterprise management system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,375,000 3. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION a. For the continued development and implementation of an educational data warehouse that will be utilized by teachers, parents, school district administrators, area education agency staff, department of education staff, and policymakers: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, the House File 1039, p. 11 department may use a portion for an e-transcript data system capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ education via interconnectivity with multiple schools. b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES For technology costs associated with the state poison control center: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,000 5. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT For the continued implementation of a statewide mass notification and emergency messaging system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 6. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT a. For the continued development and implementation of a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for budget and financial information: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 b. For the continued development and implementation of the comprehensive electronic grant management system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and property tax system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is placed on the internet for budget and financial information: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 e. For the security office of the chief information officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and miscellaneous purposes: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the continued development and implementation of Iowaâs criminal justice information system: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 g. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data warehouse: House File 1039, p. 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 h. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data warehouse transition: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 290,000 7. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE For the purchase of software relating to state active-duty tracking and for data conversion costs associated with migrating technology platforms: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220,000 8. TREASURER OF STATE a. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for investment tracking: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 b. For the ongoing costs associated with software used for banking reconciliations: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 Sec. 10. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. Sec. 11. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and for each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars. b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023 2025 , and ending June 30, 2024 2026 , the sum of eighteen million three hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety eighteen million two hundred sixty-nine thousand two hundred seventeen dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, House File 1039, p. 13 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . DIVISION III CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 12. 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 167, section 2, as amended by 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 6, and 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 7, is amended to read as follows: SEC. 2. REVERSION. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, for purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. 2. a. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 10, paragraph âdâ, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as amended by 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 11 , shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the project for which the appropriation was made is completed. b. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 4, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which House File 1039, p. 14 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. c. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 16, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as amended by this 2024 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. Sec. 13. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 2, as amended by 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 9, is amended to read as follows: SEC. 2. REVERSION. 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. 2. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 4, of this division of this 2022 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. Sec. 14. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 1, subsection 1, paragraph b, is amended to read as follows: b. For major maintenance projects at the Iowa state capitol and for signage on capitol complex grounds : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 (1) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the House File 1039, p. 15 department of administrative services shall allocate and use the moneys necessary to improve and repair the steps on the west side of the exterior of the capitol building and for projects on the east side of the exterior of the capitol building , as directed by the legislative branch, by the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2024 2025 . (2) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the department of administrative services shall allocate and use not more than $100,000 to purchase and erect signs on the state capitol complex grounds, as directed by the legislative branch, by the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2025. Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. DIVISION IV DISTRICT COURT FURNISHINGS Sec. 16. Section 602.1303, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. A county shall provide furnishings for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff. Sec. 17. Section 602.11101, subsection 1, paragraph e, subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (2) (a) Until July 1, 1986, the county shall remain responsible for the compensation of and operating costs for court employees not presently designated for state financing and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial branch related to furnishings, supplies, and equipment purchased, leased, or maintained for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff. (b) Effective July 1, 1986, except as provided in subparagraph division (c) or (d), as applicable, the state shall assume the responsibility for the compensation of and operating costs for court employees presently designated for state financing and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial branch related to furnishings, supplies, and equipment purchased, leased, or maintained for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff. However, the county shall at all times remain responsible for the provision of suitable courtrooms, offices, and other physical facilities pursuant to section 602.1303, subsection 1 , including paint, House File 1039, p. 16 wall covering, and fixtures in the facilities. In addition, however, effective (c) Effective July 1, 2023, except as provided in subparagraph division (d), if a county expends moneys for the renovation or construction of suitable courtrooms, offices, and other physical facilities pursuant to section 602.1303 , that requires the purchase of furnishings, supplies, and equipment for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff as a result of that renovation or construction, the state shall be responsible for only seventy-five percent of the cost of the purchase. (d) Effective July 1, 2025, the state is not responsible for the cost of furnishings purchased, leased, or maintained for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff in physical facilities described in section 602.1303, subsection 1. Sec. 18. IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS DIVISION OF THIS ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 3, shall not apply to this division of this Act. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 1039, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor